Florida, session 2026, HB779.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (3) of section 985.455, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
985.455 Other dispositional issues.—
(3) Any commitment of a delinquent child to the department
must require the court to determine a minimum be for an
indeterminate period of time for the child to remain in the
commitment program, which may include periods of temporary
release; however, the child must remain in the commitment
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb779-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 779 2026
program until he or she completes the program. The minimum
period of time may not exceed the maximum term of imprisonment
that an adult may serve for the same offense, except that the
minimum period of time for a minimum-risk nonresidential
commitment for an offense that is a misdemeanor of the second
degree may be for a period not to exceed 6 months. The child
shall have an objective performance-based treatment plan while
The duration of the child's placement in the a commitment
program of any restrictiveness level shall be based on objective
performance-based treatment planning. The child's treatment plan
progress and adjustment-related issues shall be reported to the
court quarterly, unless the court requests monthly reports. If
the child is under the jurisdiction of a dependency court, the
court may receive and consider any information provided by the
Statewide Guardian ad Litem Office or the child's attorney ad
litem, if one is appointed. The child's length of stay in a
commitment program may be extended if the child fails to comply
with or participate in treatment activities. The child's length
of stay in the program shall not be extended for purposes of
sanction or punishment. Any temporary release from such program
must be approved by the court. Any child so committed may be
discharged from institutional confinement or a program upon the
direction of the department with the concurrence of the court.
The child's treatment plan progress and adjustment-related
issues must be communicated to the court at the time the
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb779-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 779 2026
department requests the court to consider releasing the child
from the commitment program. The department shall give the court
that committed the child to the department reasonable notice, in
writing, of its desire to discharge the child from a commitment
facility. The court that committed the child may thereafter
accept or reject the request. If the court does not respond
within 10 days after receipt of the notice, the request of the
department shall be deemed granted. This section does not limit
the department's authority to revoke a child's temporary release
status and return the child to a commitment facility for any
violation of the terms and conditions of the temporary release.
Section 2. Subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section
985.465, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3),
(4), and (5), respectively, subsection (1) is amended, and a new
subsection (2) is added to that section, to read:
985.465 Maximum-risk residential facilities.—A maximum-
risk residential facility is a physically secure residential
commitment program with a designated length of stay from 18
months to 36 months, primarily serving children 13 years of age
to 19 years of age or until the jurisdiction of the court
expires. Each child committed to this level must meet one of the
following criteria:
(1) The child is at least 13 years of age at the time of
the disposition for the current offense and has been adjudicated
on the current offense for:
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb779-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 779 2026
(a) Arson;
(b) Sexual battery;
(c) Robbery;
(d) Kidnapping;
(e) Aggravated child abuse;
(f) Aggravated assault;
(g) Aggravated stalking;
(h) Murder;
(i) Manslaughter;
(h)(j) Unlawful throwing, placing, or discharging of a
destructive device or bomb;
(i)(k) Armed burglary;
(j)(l) Aggravated battery;
(k)(m) Carjacking;
(l)(n) Home-invasion robbery;
(m)(o) Burglary with an assault or battery;
(n)(p) Any lewd or lascivious offense committed upon or in
the presence of a person less than 16 years of age; or
(o)(q) Carrying, displaying, using, threatening to use, or
attempting to use a weapon or firearm during the commission of a
felony.
(2) The child is at least 10 years of age at the time of
the disposition for the current offense and has been adjudicated
on the current offense for:
100 (a) Murder; or
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb779-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 779 2026
101 (b) Manslaughter.
102 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb779-00